Hawaii statutes.
[§451K-10] Renewal of license. (a)
Every licensee or provisional licensee under this chapter shall renew a license
granted pursuant to this chapter annually on or before June 30, with the first
renewal deadline occurring on July 1, 2010. Failure to renew a license shall
result in a forfeiture of the license. Licenses that have been so forfeited
may be restored within one year of the expiration date upon payment of renewal
and penalty fees. Failure to restore a forfeited license within one year of the
date of its expiration shall result in the automatic termination of the
license, and relicensure may require the individual to apply as a new
applicant.

(b) Proof of maintenance of American Board of
Genetic Counseling or its equivalent board certification shall be required for
license renewal.

(c) Proof of continued active candidate status
shall be required for provisional license renewal. [L 2009, c 191, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next